Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,130.02
Historical license plates; fees; delivery; fee.

(1) An initial processing fee of ten dollars shall be submitted with an application under section 60-3,130 to defray the costs of issuing the first plate to each collector and to establish a distinct identification number for each collector. A fee of fifty dollars for each vehicle so registered shall also be submitted with the application. When the department receives an application for historical license plates, the department may deliver the plates and registration certificate to the applicant by United States mail. The department may charge a postage and handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant. The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(2) For use of license plates as provided in section 60-3,130.04, a fee of twenty-five dollars shall be submitted with the application in addition to the fees specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 26;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 28.